Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1631
Reservoir, defined.

Reservoir means any basin which contains or will contain impounded water, wastewater, or liquid-borne materials by virtue of such water, wastewater, or liquid-borne materials having been impounded by a dam.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 31.